Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.08
Sickness and accident insurance; foreign or alien insurer; provisions required by laws of domicile of insurer.

(1) Any policy of sickness and accident insurance of a foreign or alien insurer, when delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state, may contain any provision which is not less favorable to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions of sections 44-709 to 44-767 and which is prescribed or required by the law of the state under which the insurer is organized.

(2) Any policy of sickness and accident insurance of a domestic insurer may, when issued for delivery in any other state or country, contain any provision permitted or required by the laws of such other state or country.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 9, p. 656;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 138.